en: Lift/stand support point: Axle; Chassis rails; Control arm; Differential; Engine cradle/K-member; Frame; Pinch weld; Universal (multi-point); Wheels/tires; Other
sk-SK: Oporný bod zdviháka/podpery: Náprava; Nosníky podvozka; Rameno nápravy; Diferenciál; Lôžko motora/K-rám; Rám; Lem prahu; Univerzálny (viacbodový); Kolesá/pneumatiky; Iné
da: Støttepunkt for lift/stativ: Aksel; Chassisskinner; Bærearm; Differentiale; Motorramme/K-bro; Ramme; Falssvejsning; Universal (flere punkter); Hjul/dæk; Andet
ja: リフト／スタンドサポートポイント: アクスル; シャシーレール; コントロールアーム; ディファレンシャル; エンジンクレードル/Kメンバー; フレーム; ピンチウェルド; ユニバーサル (多点); ホイール/タイヤ; その他
hu: Emelő/állvány alátámasztási pontja: Tengely; Alvázgerendák; Lengőkar; Differenciálmű; Motorbölcső/K-keret; Alváz; Küszöbperem; Univerzális (többpontos); Kerekek/gumiabroncsok; Egyéb
es: Punto de apoyo del elevador o soporte: Eje; Rieles del chasis; Brazo de control; Diferencial; Cuna de motor/travesaño K; Bastidor; Borde de soldadura; Universal (multipunto); Ruedas/neumáticos; Otro
el: Σημείο υποστήριξης ανύψωσης/στήριξης: Άξονας; Ράγες πλαισίου; Ψαλίδι; Διαφορικό; Βάση κινητήρα/K-member; Πλαίσιο; Ραφή συγκόλλησης; Universal (πολλαπλών σημείων); Τροχοί/ελαστικά; Άλλο
pl: Podnośnik/stojak pomoc punktu technicznego: Oś; Podłużnice; Wahacz; Mechanizm różnicowy; Kołyska silnika / rama pomocnicza; Rama; Zgrzew punktowy progów; Uniwersalne (wielopunktowe); Koła/opony; Inne
sv: Lyft-/stödpunkt: Axel; Chassibalkar; Länkarm; Differential; Motorvagga/framaxelbrygga; Ram; Tröskelfals; Universell (flera punkter); Hjul/däck; Övrigt
bg-BG: Точка на опора на подемника/стойката: Ос; Релси на шасито; Носач; Диференциал; Люлка на двигателя/K-рамка; Рамка; Заваръчен шев; Универсална (многоточкова); Колела/гуми; Друга
zh-TW: 升降機/支架支撐點: 車軸; 底盤縱樑; 控制臂; 差速器; 引擎托架/K 型底盤構件; 車架; 夾焊處; 通用 (多點); 車輪/輪胎; 其他
lt-LT: Keltuvo / stovo atramos taškas: Ašis; Važiuoklės sijos; Valdymo svirtis; Diferencialas; Variklio atrama / K-rėmas; Rėmas; Slenksčio briauna; Universalus (kelių taškų); Ratai / padangos; Kita
cs: Zvedací/stájecí bod podpory: Náprava; Nosníky podvozku; Rameno nápravy; Diferenciál; Lůžko motoru / nápravnice; Rám; Zesílený lem prahu; Univerzální (vícebodový); Kola/pneumatiky; Jiné
sl-SI: Točka podpore za dvigalko/stojalo: Os; Tirnice šasije; Nihajna roka; Diferencial; Nosilec motorja/K-okvir; Okvir; Rob praga; Univerzalno (večtočkovno); Kolesa/pnevmatike; Drugo
ko: 리프트/스탠드 지지 포인트: 액슬; 섀시 레일; 컨트롤 암; 차동장치; 엔진 크래들/K 멤버; 프레임; 핀치 웰드; 범용(다중 포인트); 휠/타이어; 기타
nb: Støttepunkt for løftestativ: Aksel; Chassisramme; Bærearm; Differensial; Motorramme/K-ramme; Ramme; Fals; Universell (flerpunkt); Hjul/dekk; Annet
pt-PT: Ponto de apoio para levantar/ficar em pé: Eixo; Longarinas do chassis; Braço de suspensão; Diferencial; Berço do motor/subchassis; Estrutura; Rebordo de soldadura; Universal (multiponto); Rodas/pneus; Outro
fi: Nostimen/telineen tukipiste: Akseli; Runkopalkit; Tukivarsi; Tasauspyörästö; Moottorikelkka / apurunko; Runko; Helman nostokohta; Yleismallinen (monipiste); Pyörät/renkaat; Muu
fr: Point d’appui du pont élévateur ou du support: Essieu; Rails de châssis; Bras de suspension; Différentiel; Berceau moteur/traverse; Cadre; Feuillure de bas de caisse; Universel (multipoint); Roues/pneus; Autre
th: จุดช่วยเหลือการยก/ยืน: เพลา; รางแชสซี; ปีกนก; เฟืองท้าย; แท่นรองเครื่องยนต์/คานหน้าใต้เครื่อง; โครงสร้าง; ขอบสันรอยเชื่อม; ทั่วไป (หลายจุด); ล้อ/ยาง; อื่นๆ
de: Hebe-/Auflagepunkt: Achse; Fahrgestellschienen; Querlenker; Differential; Motorhilfsrahmen/K-Träger; Rahmen; Schwellerkante; Universal (Mehrpunkt); Räder/Reifen; Sonstige
it: Punto di appoggio del sollevatore/cavalletto: Asse; Longheroni del telaio; Braccio di sospensione; Differenziale; Culla motore/Telaietto ausiliario; Telaio; Saldatura del sottoporta; Universale (multipunto); Ruote/pneumatici; Altro
ro-RO: Punct de asistență pentru ridicare/staționare: Ax; Lonjeroane șasiu; Braț de control; Diferențial; Suport motor/K-member; Cadru; Cusătură de sudură; Universal (multipunct); Roți/anvelope; Altele
tr: Kaldırma/stand destek noktası: Dingil; Şasi rayları; Salıncak kolu; Diferansiyel; Motor beşiği/Travers; Şasi; Kordon kaynağı; Evrensel (çok noktalı); Tekerlekler/lastikler; Diğer
zh-CN: 举升机/支架支撑点: 车轴; 底盘纵梁; 控制臂; 差速器; 发动机托架/元宝梁; 车架; 压边焊缝; 通用（多点）; 车轮/轮胎; 其他
vi: Điểm hỗ trợ nâng/đứng: Trục; Thanh ray khung gầm; Càng chữ A; Bộ vi sai; Khung đỡ động cơ/Khung chữ K; Khung; Gờ hàn gập; Đa năng (nhiều điểm); Bánh xe/lốp xe; Khác
hr-HR: Točka podrške za podizanje/stajanje: Osovina; Nosači šasije; Vilica ovjesa; Diferencijal; Nosač motora / K-okvir; Okvir; Spoj pragova; Univerzalno (više točaka); Kotači/gume; Ostalo
nl: Lift/standaard steunpunt: As; Chassisbalken; Draagarm; Differentieel; Motorwieg/subframe; Frame; Felsnaad; Universeel (meerpunts); Wielen/banden; Overige
ru: Точка опоры подъемника и стойки: Ось; Лонжероны шасси; Рычаг подвески; Дифференциал; Подрамник двигателя/К-образный подрамник; Рама; Сварной шов порога; Универсальная (многоточечная); Колеса/шины; Другое
pt-BR: Elevador/suporte ponto de apoio: Eixo; Longarinas do chassi; Braço de controle; Diferencial; Berço do motor/Agregado; Chassi; Solda de emenda; Universal (multiponto); Rodas/pneus; Outro